District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.64

Resisting the Office or Commission.

(a)

Any person who shall willfully resist, prevent, impede or interfere with the Office or the Commission, or any of their representatives, in the performance of any duty under the provisions of this chapter, or shall willfully violate an order of the Commission, shall upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not more than 10 days, or by a fine of not more than $300, or by both, except, that filing a petition for review of an order, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall not be deemed to constitute such willful conduct, nor shall compliance with any procedure regarding a subpoena in accord with § 5-1021, be deemed to constitute such willful conduct.

(b)

It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for a person subject to this chapter, to fail to post notices, maintain records, file reports, as required by §§ 2-1402.51 to 2-1402.53, or to supply documents and information requested by the Office in connection with a matter under investigation.

History

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 264, 24 DCR 6038

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2528.
1973 Ed., § 6-2274.